Tennessee, session 114, HB2418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-36-110(c), is amended by deleting
"ninety (90) days" and substituting "ninety-five (95) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2418
012739
- 1 -